New York, session 2025-2026, A7410.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 275-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 275-a. Refusal of a request to remove library materials. 1. For the 4 purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following 5 meanings: 6 (a) "Individual with a vested interest" means any resident who is 7 served by the school or public library or resides in a county or munici- 8 pality where the school or public library is situated. 9 (b) "Library material" means any material including, but not limited 10 to, nonfiction and fiction books; magazines; reference books; supplemen- 11 tary titles; multimedia and digital material; software and instructional 12 material and other material not required as part of classroom instruc- 13 tion, belonging to, on loan to, or otherwise in the custody of a school 14 or public library. 15 (c) "Library staff member" means a school or public library media 16 specialist, librarian, any certificated or non-certificated staff member 17 assigned to duties in a school or public library, or any individual 18 conducting or assisting with the functions of a school or public library 19 media specialist or school or public librarian. 20 2. Where an individual with a vested interest or government agency 21 requests that library material be removed from a school or public 22 library and a library staff member fails to remove such library materi- 23 al, nothing in this section shall be construed as creating a cause of 24 action against such library staff member for failing to remove such 25 library material from a school or public library. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01814-02-5